California, session 20252026, AB1845.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Student Safety and Anti-Exploitation Act.SEC. 2. Section 66281.85 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 66281.8, to read:66281.85. (a) On or before July 1, 2027, a postsecondary institution shall include all of the following as part of training it provides for employees:(1) The definition of human trafficking, including sex trafficking and labor trafficking.(2) Myths and misconceptions about human trafficking.(3) Physical and mental signs to be aware of that may indicate that human trafficking is occurring.(4) Guidance on how to identify individuals who are most at risk for human trafficking.(5) Protocols on how to report human trafficking, including, but not limited to, the national hotlines available by calling 1-888-373-7888 or by texting 233-733, the contact information for local law enforcement agencies that an employee may use to make a confidential report, and the contact information of appropriate campus authorities consistent with the policy adopted pursuant to Section 67381.1.(b) Beginning July 1, 2027, a postsecondary institution shall ensure that each employee annually completes the training described in this section.(c) This section does not require a postsecondary institution to provide separate training for identification of human trafficking. A postsecondary institution may include the training required by this section in an existing employee training required by the institution. (d) The employee training described in this section may include information and materials used in training by private nonprofit organizations that represent the interests of human trafficking victims and information and materials produced by the Department of Justice.(e) Failing to report human trafficking to a postsecondary institution or to local law enforcement agencies by an employee of the postsecondary institution shall not, by itself, result in the liability of a postsecondary institution.(f) A postsecondary institution shall post and display the model notice developed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 52.6 of the Civil Code on the institution’s internet website and in a prominent location on campus.(g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Human trafficking” means any violation of Section 236.1 of the Penal Code.(2) “Postsecondary institution” means a campus of the University of California, the California State University, or the California Community Colleges, a private postsecondary educational institution, or an independent institution of higher education that receives state financial assistance.(3) “Prominent location” means that location, or those locations, in the main administrative building or other area where notices regarding the institution’s rules, regulations, and procedures, and standards of conduct are posted.SEC. 3. Section 67380 of the Education Code is amended to read:67380. (a) Except as provided in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (6) and subdivisions (d) and (e), the governing board of each community college district, the Trustees of the California State University, the Board of Directors of the College of the Law, San Francisco, the Regents of the University of California, and the governing board of any postsecondary educational institution receiving public funds for student financial assistance shall do all of the following:(1) Require the appropriate officials at each campus within their respective jurisdictions to compile records of both of the following:(A) All occurrences reported to campus police, campus security personnel, or campus safety authorities of, and arrests for, crimes that are committed on campus and that involve violence, human trafficking, hate violence, theft, destruction of property, illegal drugs, or alcohol intoxication.(B) All occurrences of noncriminal acts of hate violence reported to, and for which a written report is prepared by, designated campus authorities.(2) Require any written record of a noncriminal act of hate violence to include, but not be limited to, the following:(A) A description of the act of hate violence.(B) Victim characteristics.(C) Offender characteristics, if known.(3) (A) Make the information concerning the crimes compiled pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) available within two business days following the request of any student or employee of, or applicant for admission to, any campus within their respective jurisdictions, or to the media, unless the information is the type of information exempt from disclosure pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 7923.600) of Chapter 1 of Part 5 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code, in which case the information is not required to be disclosed. Notwithstanding Article 1 (commencing with Section 7923.600) of Chapter 1 of Part 5 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the name or any other personally identifying information of a victim of any crime defined by Section 236.1, 243.4, 261, 262, 264, 264.1, 273a, 273d, 273.5, 286, 287, 288, 289, 422.6, 422.7, or 422.75 of, or former Section 288a of, the Penal Code shall not be disclosed without the permission of the victim, or the victim’s parent or guardian if the victim is a minor.(B) For purposes of this paragraph and subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), the campus police, campus security personnel, and campus safety authorities described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) shall be included within the meaning of “state or local police agency” and “state and local law enforcement agency,” as those terms are used in Article 1 (commencing with Section 7923.600) of Chapter 1 of Part 5 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code.(4) (A) Require the appropriate officials at each campus within their respective jurisdictions to prepare, prominently post, and copy for distribution on request, a campus safety plan that sets forth all of the following:(i) The availability and location of security personnel.(ii) The methods for summoning assistance of security personnel.(iii) Any special safeguards that have been established for particular facilities or activities.(iv) Any actions taken in the preceding 18 months to increase safety.(v) Any changes in safety precautions expected to be made during the next 24 months.(B) For purposes of this paragraph, posting and distribution may be accomplished by including relevant safety information in a student handbook or brochure that is made generally available to students.(5) Require the appropriate officials at each campus within their respective jurisdictions to report information compiled pursuant to paragraph (1) relating to hate violence to the governing board, trustees, board of directors, or regents, as the case may be. The governing board, trustees, board of directors, or regents, as the case may be, shall, upon collection of that information from all of the campuses within their jurisdiction, make a report containing a compilation of that information available to the general public on the internet website of each respective institution. It is the intent of the Legislature that the governing board of each community college district, the Trustees of the California State University, the Board of Directors of the College of the Law, San Francisco, the Regents of the University of California, and the governing board of any postsecondary educational institution receiving public funds for student financial assistance establish guidelines for identifying and reporting occurrences of hate violence. It is the intent of the Legislature that the guidelines established by these postsecondary educational institutions be as consistent with each other as possible. These guidelines shall be developed in consultation with the Civil Rights Department and the California Association of Human Relations Organizations.(6) (A) Notwithstanding Article 1 (commencing with Section 7923.600) of Chapter 1 of Part 5 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code, require any report made by a victim or an employee pursuant to Section 67383 of a Part 1 violent crime, sexual assault, human trafficking, or hate crime, as described in Section 422.55 of the Penal Code, received by a campus security authority and made by the victim for purposes of notifying the institution or law enforcement, to be immediately, or as soon as practicably possible, disclosed to the local law enforcement agency with which the institution has a written agreement pursuant to Section 67381 without identifying the victim, unless the victim consents to being identified after the victim has been informed of the victim’s right to have the victim’s personally identifying information withheld. If the victim does not consent to being identified, the alleged assailant shall not be identified in the information disclosed to the local law enforcement agency, unless the institution determines both of the following, in which case the institution shall disclose the identity of the alleged assailant to the local law enforcement agency and shall immediately inform the victim of that disclosure:(i) The alleged assailant represents a serious or ongoing threat to the safety of students, employees, or the institution.(ii) The immediate assistance of the local law enforcement agency is necessary to contact or detain the assailant.(B) The requirements of this paragraph shall not constitute a waiver of, or exception to, any law providing for the confidentiality of information.(C) This paragraph applies only as a condition for participation in the Cal Grant Program established pursuant to Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) of Part 42.(b) Any person who is refused information required to be made available pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) may maintain a civil action for damages against any institution that refuses to provide the information, and the court shall award that person an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) if the court finds that the institution refused to provide the information.(c) For purposes of this section:(1) “Hate violence” means any act of physical intimidation or physical harassment, physical force or physical violence, or the threat of physical force or physical violence, that is directed against any person or group of persons, or the property of any person or group of persons because of the ethnicity, race, national origin, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, disability, or political or religious beliefs of that person or group.(2) “Human trafficking” means a violation of Section 236.1 of the Penal Code. (3) “Part 1 violent crime” means willful homicide, forcible rape, robbery, or aggravated assault, as defined in the Uniform Crime Reporting Handbook of the Federal Bureau of Investigation.(4) “Sexual assault” includes, but is not limited to, rape, forced sodomy, forced oral copulation, rape by a foreign object, sexual battery, or the threat of any of these.(d) This section does not apply to the governing board of a private postsecondary educational institution receiving funds for student financial assistance with a full-time enrollment of less than 1,000 students.(e) This section shall apply to a campus of one of the segments of public postsecondary education identified in subdivision (a) only if that campus has a full-time equivalent enrollment of more than 1,000 students.SEC. 4. Section 67381 of the Education Code is amended to read:67381. (a) The Legislature reaffirms that campus law enforcement agencies have the primary authority for providing police or security services, including the investigation of criminal activity, to their campuses.(b) The Trustees of the California State University, the Regents of the University of California, the governing board of each community college district, and the governing board of independent postsecondary institutions, as defined, shall adopt rules requiring each of their respective campuses to enter into written agreements with local law enforcement agencies that clarify operational responsibilities for investigations of human trafficking, Part 1 violent crimes, sexual assaults, and hate crimes occurring on each campus.(c) Local law enforcement agencies shall enter into written agreements with campus law enforcement agencies if there are college or university campuses of the governing entities specified in subdivision (b) located in the jurisdictions of the local law enforcement agencies.(d) Each written agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall designate which law enforcement agency shall have operational responsibility for the investigation of each human trafficking, Part 1 violent crime, sexual assault, and hate crime, and delineate the specific geographical boundaries of each agency’s operational responsibility, including maps as necessary.(e) A written agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall be reviewed, updated if necessary, and made available for public viewing on or before July 1, 2027, and every five years thereafter.(f) Each agency shall be responsible for its own costs of investigation unless otherwise specified in a written agreement.(g) This section shall not affect existing written agreements between campus law enforcement agencies and local law enforcement agencies that otherwise meet the standards contained in subdivision (d) or any existing mutual aid procedures established pursuant to state or federal law.(h) This section shall not limit the authority of campus law enforcement agencies to provide police services to their campuses.(i) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Hate crime” means any offense described in Section 422.55 of the Penal Code.(2) “Human trafficking” means a violation of Section 236.1 of the Penal Code.(3) “Independent postsecondary institutions” means institutions operating pursuant to Section 830.6 of the Penal Code or pursuant to a memorandum of understanding as described in subdivision (b) of Section 830.7 of the Penal Code.(4) “Local law enforcement agencies” means city or county law enforcement agencies with operational responsibilities for police services in the community in which a campus is located.(5) “Part 1 violent crimes” means willful homicide, forcible rape, robbery, and aggravated assault, as defined in the Uniform Crime Reporting Handbook of the Federal Bureau of Investigation.(6) “Sexual assault” includes, but is not limited to, rape, forced sodomy, forced oral copulation, rape by a foreign object, sexual battery, or threat of any of these.(j) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the Kristin Smart Campus Safety Act of 1998.(k) It is the intent of the Legislature by enacting this section to provide the public with clear information regarding the operational responsibilities for the investigation of crimes occurring on university and college campuses by setting minimum standards for written agreements to be entered into by campus law enforcement agencies and local law enforcement agencies.SEC. 5. Section 67381.1 of the Education Code is repealed.SEC. 6. Section 67381.1 is added to the Education Code, to read:67381.1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:(1) Human trafficking is inimical to every postsecondary educational institution’s core values and inherently harmful and dehumanizing.(2) Human trafficking is a violation of human rights and a violation of federal and state law.(b) In order to receive state funds for student financial assistance, the governing board of each community college district, the Trustees of the California State University, the Regents of the University of California, and the governing boards of independent postsecondary educational institutions shall adopt a policy concerning incidents of human trafficking that involve students, faculty, or staff. The policy shall include all of the following:(1) A statement that human trafficking is a state and federal crime.(2) A statement that a conviction of human trafficking by a criminal court is a violation of the student and employee code of conduct.(3) Physical and mental signs to be aware of that may indicate that human trafficking is occurring.(4) Guidance on how to identify individuals who are most at risk for human trafficking.(5) Protocols on how to report human trafficking, including, but not limited to, the national hotlines available by calling 1-888-373-7888 or by texting 233-733, the contact information for local law enforcement agencies that a person may use to make a confidential report, and the contact information for appropriate campus authorities.(c) For purposes of this section, “human trafficking” means a violation of Section 236.1 of the Penal Code.SEC. 7. Section 67383 of the Education Code is amended to read:67383. (a) As a condition for participation in the Cal Grant Program established pursuant to Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) of Part 42 or the Cal Grant Reform Act established pursuant to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 69405) of Part 42, as applicable, the governing board of each community college district, the Trustees of the California State University, the Regents of the University of California, and the governing board of each private and independent postsecondary educational institution shall, on or before July 1, 2027, adopt and implement written policies and procedures to ensure that any report of human trafficking, a Part 1 violent crime, sexual assault, or hate crime, committed on or off campus, received by a campus security authority, as defined pursuant to Section 668.46 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as that section existed on May 15, 2014, and made by the victim for purposes of notifying the institution or law enforcement, is immediately, or as soon as practicably possible, forwarded to the appropriate law enforcement agency.(b) Notwithstanding Article 1 (commencing with Section 7923.600) of Chapter 1 of Part 5 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the report shall be forwarded to the appropriate law enforcement agency without identifying the victim, unless the victim consents to being identified after the victim has been informed of the victim’s right to have the victim’s personally identifying information withheld.(c) For purposes of this section, the appropriate law enforcement agency shall be a campus law enforcement agency if one has been established on the campus where the report was made. If no campus law enforcement agency has been established, the report shall be immediately, or as soon as practicably possible, forwarded to a local law enforcement agency.(d) For purposes of this section:(1) “Hate crime” means any offense as described in Section 422.55 of the Penal Code.(2) “Human trafficking” means a violation of Section 236.1 of the Penal Code.(3) “Local law enforcement agency” means a city or county law enforcement agency with operational responsibilities for police services in the community in which a campus is located.(4) “On or off campus” means the campus and any noncampus building or property as defined in Section 668.46 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as that section existed on May 15, 2014.(5) “Part 1 violent crime” means willful homicide, forcible rape, robbery, or aggravated assault, as defined in the Uniform Crime Reporting Handbook of the Federal Bureau of Investigation.(6) “Sexual assault” includes, but is not limited to, rape, forced sodomy, forced oral copulation, rape by a foreign object, sexual battery, or the threat of any of these.(e) The requirements of this section shall not constitute a waiver of, or exception to, any law providing for the confidentiality of information.SEC. 8. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.